Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 4 Claims Against or In Favor of Estate

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (2009).

53-7-40.
Liability of estate; priority of claims.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all property of the estate, both real and personal, shall be liable for the payment of claims against the estate in the following order:

Year’s support for the family;

Funeral expenses, whether or not the decedent leaves a surviving spouse, in an amount which corresponds with the circumstances of the decedent in life. If the estate is solvent, the personal representative is authorized to provide a suitable protection for the grave;

Other necessary expenses of administration;

Reasonable expenses of the decedent’s last illness;

Unpaid taxes or other debts due the state or the United States;

Judgments, secured interests, and other liens created during the lifetime of the decedent, to be paid according to their priority of lien. Secured interests and other liens on specific property shall be preferred only to the extent of such property; and

All other claims.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Action against representative of joint obligor of a note, bill, bond, or other obligation in writing, §

9-2-27

.

Priority of tax liens generally, §

48-2-56

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Recovery of assistance; no estate, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Estate Recovery, Department of Community Health, Medical Assistance, Estate Recovery, Sec. 111-3-8-.06.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For comment on King v. Dalton,

85 Ga. App. 641

,

69 S.E.2d 907

(1952), see
15 Ga. B.J. 211 (1952).

53-7-41.
Notice for creditors to render accounts; notification of creditors’ claims; requirement of reasonable additional proof or accounting; failure of creditors to give notice of claims.

The personal representative shall be allowed six months from the date of the qualification of the first personal representative to serve in which to ascertain the condition of the estate.

Every personal representative shall, within 60 days from the date of qualification, publish a notice directed generally to all of the creditors of the estate to notify the personal representative of their claims and render an account of their demands for payment thereon. The personal representative’s notice shall be published once a week for four weeks in the official newspaper of the county in which the personal representative qualified. No particular form shall be required for creditors to notify the personal representative of their claims, and such notification of a creditor’s claim shall be sufficient for purposes of this Code section if given in writing, providing an account number or other identifying information or itemization adequate to establish the indebtedness as an obligation of the estate, and stating the principal balance and any applicable interest or other additional charges lawfully owed. An invoice or account statement satisfying the requirements of the preceding sentence of this subsection and generated by a creditor in the ordinary course of such creditor’s business shall constitute sufficient notification to the personal representative of such creditor’s claim if the personal representative actually receives such notification of the claim or if such creditor files such notification with the probate court having jurisdiction over the decedent’s estate or sends such notification of the claim by electronic transmission, other form of wire or wireless communication, or by first-class mail or private carrier to the address of the decedent, the personal representative, or the attorney representing the personal representative; provided, however, that a notification of a claim sent by a creditor by electronic communication to an account for which the decedent is the user shall constitute sufficient notification to the personal representative of such creditor’s claim only if the content of such electronic communication lawfully is disclosed to the personal representative pursuant to Chapter 13 of this title. As used in this subsection, the terms “account”, “content of an electronic communication”, “electronic communication”, and “user” shall have the meaning provided by Code Section 53-13-2.

After receiving sufficient notification of a creditor’s claim under subsection (b) of this Code section, the personal representative may require reasonable additional proof or accounting from such creditor prior to paying such creditor’s claim, but such requirement by the personal representative shall not affect adversely the timeliness of such creditor’s notification to the personal representative of the creditor’s claims.

Creditors who fail to notify the personal representative of their claims in the manner provided by subsection (b) of this Code section within three months from the date of publication of the personal representative’s last notice shall lose all rights to an equal participation with creditors of equal priority to whom distribution is made before sufficient notification of such claims is given to the personal representative, and they may not hold the personal representative liable for a misappropriation of the funds. If, however, there are assets in the hands of the personal representative sufficient to pay such debts and if no claims of greater priority are unpaid, the assets shall be thus appropriated notwithstanding failure of such creditors to timely notify the personal representative of their claims.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 33; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-43/HB 865; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 53/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section, which read: “The personal representative shall be allowed six months from the date of the qualification of the first personal representative to serve in which to ascertain the condition of the estate. Every personal representative shall, within 60 days from the date of qualification, publish a notice directed generally to all of the creditors of the estate to render an account of their demands. The notice shall be published once a week for four weeks in the official newspaper of the county in which the personal representative qualified. Creditors who fail to give notice of claims within three months from the date of publication of the personal representative’s last notice shall lose all rights to an equal participation with creditors of equal priority to whom distribution is made before notice of such claims is brought to the personal representative, and they may not hold the personal representative liable for a misappropriation of the funds. If, however, there are assets in the hands of the personal representative sufficient to pay such debts and if no claims of greater priority are unpaid, the assets shall be thus appropriated notwithstanding failure to give notice.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “to timely notify” for “timely to notify” near the end of the last sentence of subsection (d).

53-7-42.
Time for payment of debts; time for commencing action to recover debt.

The personal representative shall not be required to pay the debts of the estate, wholly or in part, until six months from the date of qualification of the first personal representative to serve. If partial payment shall be made, it shall be pro rata on debts of equal priority, including debts due the personal representative, and shall continue pro rata until the debts of the estate shall be paid out. Successive dividends to creditors shall be made at the end of every year until the estate shall be paid out.

No action to recover a debt due by the decedent shall be commenced against the personal representative until the expiration of six months from the date of qualification of the first personal representative to serve.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Recovery of assistance; probate, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Estate Recovery, Department of Community Health, Medical Assistance, Estate Recovery, Sec. 111-3-8-.05

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia wills, trusts, and administration of estates law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 307 (1981).

For article surveying torts law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 271 (1982).

For article, “Defending the Lawsuit: A First-Round Checklist,” see 22 Ga. St. B.J. 24 (1985).

53-7-43.
Compelling heirs or beneficiaries to contribute to payment of debt.

If the estate shall have been distributed to the heirs or beneficiaries without notice of an existing debt, a creditor may compel them to contribute pro rata to the payment of the debt.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-44.
Satisfaction of debts.

Except as otherwise provided by the will, any debt not due by its terms at the time for payment of debts of equal priority shall be satisfied and the estate shall be discharged with respect to such debt in such manner as the personal representative deems to be in the best interest of the estate in accordance with the following rules:

The debt may be prepaid in accordance with the terms of any right to prepay;

By agreement with the creditor, the debt may be satisfied before it is due by the payment of an amount representing the agreed present value of the debt;

By agreement with the creditor, the debt may be assumed by one or more heirs or beneficiaries or by any other person; and

By agreement with the creditor, or by order of the probate court after notice to the creditor and a hearing, arrangement for future payment may be made by creating a trust, giving a deed to secure debt or security interest, obtaining a bond or other security from one or more heirs or beneficiaries, or otherwise.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-45.
Compromise of claims.

Personal representatives are authorized to compromise, adjust, arbitrate, assign, sue or defend, abandon, or otherwise deal with or settle debts or claims in favor of or against the estate. A personal representative who declines to litigate any claim may assign the claim to a creditor or an heir of an intestate estate or a beneficiary of a testate estate for the purpose of prosecuting the claim at that person’s own expense and, after reimbursement of the expenses to the creditor, heir, or beneficiary, any remaining proceeds shall be paid over to the personal representative for administration.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 22; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 34.

Law reviews.

For article, “Joint Bank Accounts: A Different Form of Joint Tenancy,” see 17 Ga. St. B.J. 184 (1981).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).